Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-501.01
State Fire Marshal; powers and duties; appointment; confirmation by Legislature; removal.

The Governor shall, with the advice and consent of the Legislature, appoint a State Fire Marshal who shall, under the general direction and supervision of the Governor, perform the duties and exercise the powers and have the rights and privileges conferred by sections 81-501.01 to 81-531 and 81-5,151 to 81-5,157. He or she may be removed from office at the pleasure of the Governor.

Laws 1925, c. 183, § 1, p. 479;

C.S.1929, § 81-5501;

R.S.1943, § 81-501;

Laws 1974, LB 622, § 1;

Laws 1993, LB 348, § 78.